Tennessee, session 114, HB1896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-807, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (4):
(4) Administer a nationally standardized achievement test that covers the subject
areas of English language arts and mathematics to each student each school year.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-50-807, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (b):
(b) In order to operate in this state as an approved Category III nonpublic school,
the state board of education shall require a private school described in subsection (a)
that serves students in any of the grades nine through twelve (9-12) to administer a
nationally standardized achievement test that covers the subject areas of English
language arts and mathematics to each student who is eighteen (18) years of age or
younger and has completed fifty percent (50%) of the high school program and to each
student who is eighteen (18) years of age or younger and has completed ninety percent
(90%) of the high school program, unless the student who is eighteen (18) years of age
or younger completes the entire high school program within a twelve-month period in
which case such student is only required to a take a nationally standardized
achievement test required in this subsection (b) once.
HB1896
011027
- 1 -

SECTION 3. For purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026, the
public welfare requiring it, and applies to the 2026-2027 school year and each school year
thereafter.
- 2 - 011027